Indiana, session 2026, SB155.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-8-1.5-22.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22.5. The office of the secretary
shall develop and implement a doula program that includes at least
the following:
(1) Recruitment.
(2) Eligibility requirements, such as certification or
registration.
(3) Training requirements.
(4) A doula certification body.
(5) An enrollment process for a doula to receive Medicaid
reimbursement during the twelve (12) months of a
postpartum period described in IC 12-15-2-13, including
reimbursement for telehealth services.
(6) Client outreach.
(7) A process for matching a doula to a pregnant Medicaid
recipient.
2026 IN 155—LS 6494/DI 147


(8) Caseload and reimbursement rates.
2026 IN 155—LS 6494/DI 147